District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.03

Agency affirmative action plan — Goal of representation; actual employment levels.

(a)

Each plan shall state the number of females and males who are Black, White, Spanish-speaking, Native American, and Asian American, who would, by using the goal of their representation in the available work force in the District, be employed by the agency at the actual employment levels in the agency at the time the plan is submitted. Such numbers shall be broken down:

(1)

Agency wide;

(2)

Within each office in the agency; and

(3)

Within each pay level of each salary scale in the agency.

(b)

These shall be the goals, not the quotas, of the plan. The plan shall also state the actual employment levels in the agency, broken down in the same way as the goals, and the difference between the actual employment and the goals.

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 4, 22 DCR 6539
This section is referenced in § 1-521.04 and § 1-521.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-509.
1973 Ed., § 1-320c.